de: Rebounder-Seiten: Doppelseitig; Einseitig; Dreiseitig; Sonstige
tr: Geri tepme yüzeyleri: Çift taraflı; Tek taraflı; Üç taraflı; Diğer
hu: Visszapattanóháló oldalainak száma: Kétoldalas; Egyoldalas; Háromoldalas; Egyéb
lt-LT: Atšokimo treniruoklio pusės: Dvipusis; Vienpusis; Tripusis; Kita
pl: Strony reboundera: Dwustronny; Jednostronny; Trzystronny; Inne
sv: Rebounder-sidor: Dubbelsidig; Enkelsidig; Tresidig; Övrigt
en: Rebounder sides: Double-sided; Single-sided; Triple-sided; Other
cs: Strany odrazu: Oboustranné; Jednostranné; Třístranné; Ostatní
zh-TW: 回彈器側數: 雙面; 單面; 三面; 其他
es: Lados de rebote: Doble cara; De una cara; Tres caras; Otro
ja: リバウンダー面数: 両面; 片面; 3面; その他
el: Πλευρές του rebounder: Διπλής όψης; Μονής όψης; Τριπλής όψης; Άλλο
da: Rebounders sider: Dobbeltsidet; Enkeltsidet; Tresidet; Andet
bg-BG: Страни на тренажора за отскок: Двустранен; Едностранен; Тристранен; Други
hr-HR: Strane skakača: Dvostrano; Jednostrano; Trostrano; Ostalo
ko: 리바운더 측면: 양면; 단면; 3면; 기타
sk-SK: Strany odrazovej siete: Obojstranné; Jednostranné; Trojstranné; Iné
fi: Rebounder-seinän puolet: Kaksipuolinen; Yksipuolinen; Kolmipuolinen; Muu
it: Lati del rimbalzatore: Bifacciale; Monofacciale; Trifacciale; Altro
zh-CN: 回弹器面数: 双面; 单面; 三面; 其他
pt-PT: Lados do rebatedor: Dupla face; Face única; Face tripla; Outro
th: ด้านข้างของรีบาวน์เดอร์: สองด้าน; ด้านเดียว; สามด้าน; อื่นๆ
vi: Mặt bật lại: Hai mặt; Một mặt; Ba mặt; Khác
nl: Rebounder zijden: Dubbelzijdig; Enkelzijdig; Driezijdig; Overig
ro-RO: Laturile panoului de revenire: Cu două fețe; Cu o singură față; Cu trei fețe; Altele
sl-SI: Strani odbojne mreže: Obojestransko; Enostransko; Tostransko; Drugo
nb: Rebounder-sider: Tosidig; Enkeltsidig; Tresidig; Annet
ru: Стороны ребаундера: Двусторонний; Односторонний; Трехсторонний; Другое
fr: Faces du rebondisseur: Double face; Simple face; Triple face; Autre
pt-BR: Rebatedor lados: Dupla face; Face única; Três faces; Outro